Colorado, session 2026A, HB1131.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Colorado:
Shading denotes HOUSE amendment. Double underlining denotes SENATE amendment.
Capital letters or bold & italic numbers indicate new material to be added to existing law.
Dashes through the words or numbers indicate deletions from existing law.

SECTION 1. In Colorado Revised Statutes, add 14-10-113.2 as
follows:
14-10-113.2. Disposition of pet animal - definition.
(1) AS USED IN THIS SECTION, UNLESS THE CONTEXT OTHERWISE
REQUIRES, "PET ANIMAL" HAS THE MEANING SET FORTH IN SECTION
35-80-102.
(2) IN A PROCEEDING FOR DISSOLUTION OF MARRIAGE OR IN A
PROCEEDING FOR LEGAL SEPARATION OR IN A PROCEEDING FOR
DISPOSITION OF PROPERTY FOLLOWING THE PREVIOUS DISSOLUTION OF
MARRIAGE BY A COURT THAT AT THE TIME OF THE PRIOR DISSOLUTION OF
THE MARRIAGE LACKED PERSONAL JURISDICTION OVER THE ABSENT
SPOUSE OR LACKED JURISDICTION TO DISPOSE OF THE PROPERTY, THE
COURT, UPON THE REQUEST OF A PARTY, SHALL AWARD CARE AND
CUSTODY OF A PET ANIMAL.
(3) IN AWARDING SOLE OR SHARED CUSTODY OF A PET ANIMAL,
THE COURT SHALL CONSIDER THE BEST INTEREST OF THE PET ANIMAL,
TAKING INTO ACCOUNT THE PET ANIMAL'S HEALTH, SAFETY, COMFORT,
AND WELL-BEING, AND ANY RELEVANT FACTS, INCLUDING, BUT NOT
LIMITED TO:
(a) WHETHER THE PARTIES ARE SEEKING SOLE OR SHARED
CUSTODY OF THE PET ANIMAL;
(b) EACH PARTY'S HISTORY WITH THE PET ANIMAL, INCLUDING
WHO ACQUIRED THE ANIMAL; THE SUBSEQUENT AMOUNT OF TIME SPENT
WITH THE PET ANIMAL; EXPENSES INCURRED IN CARING FOR THE PET
ANIMAL; AND PET ANIMAL CAREGIVING RESPONSIBILITIES UNDERTAKEN BY
EACH PARTY, SUCH AS FEEDING, WALKING, PLAYING, GROOMING,
TRAINING, AND VETERINARY VISITS;
-2- HB26-1131

(c) THE EMOTIONAL ATTACHMENT OF EACH PARTY TO THE PET
ANIMAL, AND, IF RELEVANT, THE EMOTIONAL ATTACHMENT OF ANY
CHILDREN IN THE HOUSEHOLD TO THE PET ANIMAL; AND
(d) WHETHER THE COURT FINDS BY A PREPONDERANCE OF THE
EVIDENCE THAT ONE OF THE PARTIES HAS COMMITTED ABUSE, CRUELTY,
NEGLECT, OR VIOLENCE TOWARD AN ANIMAL OR A HUMAN.
(4) IN AWARDING SHARED CUSTODY OF A PET ANIMAL, THE COURT
SHALL ORDER A DIVISION OF CARE AND CUSTODY, INCLUDING, BUT NOT
LIMITED TO, THE DIVISION OF TIME AND EXPENSES FOR FOOD, TOYS,
GROOMING, TRAINING, AND VETERINARY VISITS. IN THE EVENT OF A
SUBSTANTIAL CHANGE OF CIRCUMSTANCE, A PARTY MAY FILE A
COMPLAINT FOR MODIFICATION.
(5) BEFORE THE COURT AWARDS CUSTODY OF A PET ANIMAL:
(a) THE PET ANIMAL SHALL NOT BE TRANSFERRED, ENCUMBERED,
CONCEALED, OR DISPOSED OF WITHOUT THE WRITTEN AGREEMENT OF ALL
PARTIES OR AN ORDER OF THE COURT; AND
(b) A PARTY MAY SEEK A TEMPORARY ORDER REGARDING
CUSTODY, CARE, AND PAYMENT OF EXPENSES OF THE PET ANIMAL OR A
PROTECTION ORDER, BUT A PARTY MUST NOT BE PREJUDICED BY A
TEMPORARY ORDER WHEN SEEKING A FINAL DISPOSITION OF THESE ISSUES.
(6) ANY TIME PRIOR TO THE COURT AWARDING CARE AND
CUSTODY OF A PET ANIMAL, THE PARTIES MAY ENTER INTO AN AGREEMENT
ALLOCATING THE SOLE OR SHARED CUSTODY OF THE PET ANIMAL.
(7) THE COURT MAY ENFORCE A PET ANIMAL CUSTODY
AGREEMENT, INCLUDING THROUGH A COMPLAINT FOR CONTEMPT TO
ENFORCE A JUDGMENT OF DIVORCE AND SEPARATION AGREEMENT AND
THROUGH A COMPLAINT IN EQUITY TO ENFORCE AN AGREEMENT ENTERED
-3- HB26-1131

INTO BY NONMARRIED INDIVIDUALS. THE COURT MAY AWARD AN
EQUITABLE REMEDY, INCLUDING SHARED CUSTODY OR BY DETERMINING
THAT SOLE CUSTODY BY ONE PARTY IS IN THE BEST INTEREST OF THE PET
ANIMAL USING THE PROCESS ESTABLISHED IN THIS SECTION.
SECTION 2. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 14-10-113, amend
(1) introductory portion as follows:
14-10-113. Disposition of property - definitions.
(1) In a proceeding for dissolution of marriage or in a proceeding
for legal separation or in a proceeding for disposition of property
following the previous dissolution of marriage by a court which THAT at
the time of the prior dissolution of the marriage lacked personal
jurisdiction over the absent spouse or lacked jurisdiction to dispose of the
property, the court, subject to the provisions of subsection (7) of this
section, AND SUBJECT TO SECTION 14-10-113.2 FOR DETERMINING
CUSTODY OF A PET ANIMAL, shall set apart to each spouse his or her THEIR
property and shall divide the marital property, without regard to marital
misconduct, in such proportions as the court deems just after considering
all relevant factors, including:
SECTION 3. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 13-14-103, amend
(1)(b)(V), (1)(b)(VI), (1)(b)(VII), and (2)(a) as follows:
13-14-103. Emergency protection orders.
(1) (b) An emergency protection order issued pursuant to this
subsection (1) may include:
(V) Restraining a party from molesting, injuring, killing, taking,
transferring, encumbering, concealing, disposing of, or threatening harm
to an animal owned, possessed, leased, kept, or held by any other party,
a minor child of either of the parties, or an elderly or at-risk adult; or
-4- HB26-1131

(VI) Specifying arrangements for possession and care of an
animal owned, possessed, leased, kept, or held by any other party, a minor
child of either of the parties, or an elderly or at-risk adult; OR
(VII) AWARDING TEMPORARY CUSTODY AND CARE OF A PET
ANIMAL OF A PARTY INVOLVED.
(2) (a) A verbal emergency protection order may be issued
pursuant to subsection (1) of this section only if the issuing judge finds
that the risk or threat of physical harm or the threat of psychological or
emotional harm exists in close proximity to one or more persons or that
the risk or threat of physical harm or the threat of psychological or
emotional harm exists to the life or health of the minor child OR THE PET
ANIMAL OF A PARTY INVOLVED in the reasonably foreseeable future.
SECTION 4. Act subject to petition - effective date. This act
takes effect at 12:01 a.m. on the day following the expiration of the
ninety-day period after final adjournment of the general assembly (August
12, 2026, if adjournment sine die is on May 13, 2026); except that, if a
referendum petition is filed pursuant to section 1 (3) of article V of the
state constitution against this act or an item, section, or part of this act
within such period, then the act, item, section, or part will not take effect
unless approved by the people at the general election to be held in
November 2026 and, in such case, will take effect on the date of the
official declaration of the vote thereon by the governor.
-5- HB26-1131